src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON GADDILONGSHORT !!≈ * **@CODE@** NB! No SgIll and SgLoc (not directed to GOADI-, GODII- or GOAHTAI) because *davvi* is the only word this far Bisyll. V-Nouns with Comp. Forms, long-short nomcmp, long gencmp
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag  ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X7 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 +Ess:%>n K ;
! +Ess:%>n%> NPxC ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
! :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>X4 R ; !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 :%> GOAHTE- ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>X4b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>X4muss BUOREMUS ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4muš K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Attr+Err/Orth:%>X4muš K ;


LEXICON GADDISHORT !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Nouns with Comparative Forms.  Short nom-compound-forms, SHORT gen.
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag  ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :%>X8 GOADE-IU- ; ! Ditto (?)
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>X4b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>X4muss BUOREMUS ;
!   DenominalNounsV ;
!   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
!   DenominalAdjsV2 ;

LEXICON OARJI !!≈ * **@CODE@** máddi, nuorti, nuorta, oarji. Comparative Forms.  Short nom-compound-forms, long gen. Incomplete paradigms
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag  ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X7 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 +Ess:%>n K ;
 +Ess:%>n%> NPxC ;
! +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx1V ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>X2 NPx1V ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>X2 NPx1V ;
! +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx2V ; Bug1367
! :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ; !^P^
! +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
! ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
! +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 !+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
! :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! :%> GOAHTE- ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>X4b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>X4muss BUOREMUS ;
!   DenominalNounsV ;
!   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
!   DenominalAdjsV2 ;

LEXICON LULLILONG !!≈ * **@CODE@** long compound forms
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag  ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
! +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx1V ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>X2 NPx1V ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>X2 NPx1V ;
! +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx2V ; Bug1367
! :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ; !^P^
! +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
! ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
! +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
! +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
! +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
! :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>X4b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>X4muss BUOREMUS ;
!   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
!   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
!   DenominalNounsV ;





!!!!! 2e. tweaked lexicas (mostly) for speller reasons
! - - - - - - - ----------------------------------


LEXICON VARRA !!≈ * **@CODE@**  varra and uvdna. No -laš, to get rid of varalaš and uvnnalaš from speller
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
   DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +Err/Orth: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON LASSA !!≈ * **@CODE@**  want this without essive Px: *lassanan, *lassanat, *lassaneame
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 +Ess:%>n K ;
 :%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
   DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +Err/Orth: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON AKCU !!≈ * **@CODE@**  No -heapme, no wg+Foc/han (thereby avoiding ávččuhit, ávččuhan, ávččuhat in speller) Short nom-compound-form ákčo-,long/short gen
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
! :%> GOAHTI-OBL ; replaced by individual pointers:
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl, replaced by individual pointers
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K_not_ge ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K_not_ge ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4k K ;
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! :%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)
 +Err/Orth: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +Err/Orth: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;
