src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Noun  !!= * **@CODE@**
eahpegudni+N+CmpNP/First+Sem/Perc-emo:eahpe#gudni¤ GADDISHORT ;
LEXICON NounNoPx   !!= * **@CODE@** here goes nouns not taking Px.
davvi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:davvi GADDILONGSHORT "north N" ;
davvi+N+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Plc:dávvi GADDILONGSHORT "north N" ;
fálli+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:fálºli AKCU "falcon N" ;
krambuseaidni+N+Err/Lex+Use/LIA+Sem/Buildpart:krambu#seajdni GADDISHORT ; !LIA
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
bassinuvdna+N+Sem/Obj-el:bassin#uvdna VARRA ;
beavdi+N+Sem/Furn:beavºdi GADDISHORT ;
bohccovarra+N+Sem/Food:bohcco#varra VARRA ;
davvilulli+N+Sem/Dummytag:davvi#lulli LULLILONG ;
dulvi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time_Wthr:dulºvi GADDISHORT ;
geađgeuvdna+N+Sem/Dummytag:geađge#uvdna VARRA ;
girkolassa+N+Sem/Buildpart:girko#lassa LASSA ;
goanstavarra+N+Sem/Body:goansta#varra VARRA ;
gudni+N+Sem/Perc-emo:gudni¤ GADDISHORT ;
gudni+N+Sem/Perc-emo+Err/Orth:gutni GADDISHORT ;
gumpposvarra+N+Sem/Aniprod:gumppos#varra VARRA ;
gáddi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:gáddi GADDISHORT "shore N" ;
jápmavarra+N+Sem/Body:jápma#varra VARRA ;
kirkolassa+N+Sem/Buildpart:kirko#lassa LASSA ;
koanstavarra+N+Sem/Body:koansta#varra VARRA ;
kveanavarra+N+Sem/Dummytag:kveana#varra VARRA ;
kvenavarra+N+Sem/Dummytag:kvena#varra VARRA ;
lassa+N+CmpNP/First+Sem/Build-room:lassa LASSA ;
lulli+N+Sem/Dummytag:lulli LULLILONG ;
máddi+N+CmpNP/None+Sem/Plc:máddi OARJI ;
nuorta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:nuorºta OARJI ; ! since it has comparative
nuorti+N+CmpNP/None+Sem/Plc:nuorºti OARJI ;
oaffarvarra+N+Sem/Aniprod:oaffar#varra VARRA ;
oarji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:oarºji OARJI ;
riškkuhanvarra+N+Sem/Dummytag:riškkuhan#varra VARRA ;
rohkka+N+Sem/Dummytag:rohkka AKCU ; !^LOAN
seaidni+N+Sem/Buildpart:seajdni GADDISHORT ;
spiinnivarra+N+Sem/Aniprod:spiinni#varra VARRA ;
sámevarra+N+Sem/Dummytag:sáme#varra VARRA ;
uksalassa+N+Sem/Buildpart:uksa#lassa LASSA ;
uvdna+N+Sem/Obj-el:uvdna VARRA ;
varra+N+Sem/Aniprod:varra VARRA ;
váibmovarra+N+Sem/Aniprod:váibmo#varra VARRA ;
várri+N+Sem/Plc-elevate:várri GADDISHORT ;
ákču+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:ákºču AKCU ;
čuvgesvarra+N+Sem/Body:čuvges#varra VARRA ;
čáhppesvarra+N+Sem/Body:čáhppes#varra VARRA ;
